Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE E. BENEFITS PAYABLE UNDER HEALTH COVERAGES

CHAPTER 1353. IMMUNIZATION OR VACCINATION PROTOCOLS UNDER MANAGED CARE PLANS

Sec. 1353.001. PROHIBITED CONDUCT. A managed care entity may not:

(1) require a physician participating in a managed care plan to issue an immunization or vaccination protocol for an immunization or vaccination to be administered to an enrollee in the plan;

(2) limit an enrollee's benefits for immunizations or vaccinations to circumstances in which an immunization or vaccination protocol is issued;

(3) provide a financial incentive to a physician to issue an immunization or vaccination protocol; or

(4) impose a financial or other penalty on a physician who refuses to issue an immunization or vaccination protocol.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1353.002. RULES. The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.